Washington statutes.
RCW 37.04.030

Reserved jurisdiction of state.

The state of Washington hereby expressly reserves such jurisdiction and authority over land acquired or to be acquired by the United States as aforesaid as is not inconsistent with the jurisdiction ceded to the United States by virtue of such acquisition.

[ 1939 c 126 s 3; RRS s 8108-3.]